Arkansas, session 2025, HB1594.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-517 is amended to read as follows:
26-52-517. Exemption certificates — Farmer sales tax identification
card — Definition.
(a) The sales tax liability for all sales of tangible personal
property, specified digital products, digital codes, and taxable services is
upon the seller unless the purchaser claims an exemption and the seller
obtains identifying information of the purchaser and the reason the purchaser
is claiming the exemption in the manner prescribed by the Secretary of the
Department of Finance and Administration.
(b)(1) When tangible personal property, specified digital products, a
digital code, or taxable services are purchased tax-free under subsection (a)
*CEB147*
03-31-2025 12:54:10 CEB147

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1594
of this section and the tangible personal property, specified digital
products, digital code, or taxable service is not resold by the purchaser,
the purchaser is solely liable for reporting and remitting to the secretary
any tax which should have been paid at the time of purchase.
(2) Use or disposition of the property other than for resale
shall be deemed a withdrawal from stock for all purposes, including reporting
and remittance of the tax due, and the tax shall be due from the purchaser at
the time of the withdrawal from stock.
(c)(1) The secretary may provide sale for resale certificates to
assist retailers in properly accounting for nontaxable sales of tangible
personal property or taxable services.
(2) Such certificates must be completed as to the information
required in order to be valid and cannot be used to establish any other
exemption from sales or use tax.
(d)(1) A seller may accept a blanket exemption certificate or rely on
a previously obtained copy of a farmer sales tax identification card from a
purchaser with which the seller has a recurring business relationship.
(2) A seller is not required to renew blanket exemption
certificates, obtain a new copy of a farmer sales tax identification card, or
update exemption certificate information or data elements when there is a
recurring business relationship between the purchaser and seller.
(3) A recurring business relationship exists when a period of no
more than twelve (12) months elapses between sales transactions.
(e) A seller that follows the exemption requirements as prescribed by
the secretary is relieved from any tax otherwise applicable if it is
determined that the purchaser improperly claimed an exemption.
(f) The relief from liability provided in subsection (e) of this
section does not apply to a seller that:
(1) Fraudulently fails to collect the sales tax;
(2) Solicits a purchaser to participate in the unlawful claim of
an exemption; or
(3) Accepts an exemption certificate or farmer sales tax
identification card from a purchaser claiming an entity-based exemption if:
(A) The subject of the transaction sought to be covered by
the exemption certificate or farmer sales tax identification card is actually
received by the purchaser at a location operated by the seller; and
03-31-2025 12:54:10 CEB147

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1594
(B) The Department of Finance and Administration provides
an exemption certificate that clearly and affirmatively indicates that the
claimed exemption is not available in Arkansas.
(g)(1) A seller may obtain a fully completed exemption certificate,
obtain a copy of a farmer sales tax identification card, or capture the
relevant data elements required by the department within ninety (90) days
after the date of sale.
(2)(A) If the seller has not obtained an exemption certificate,
a copy of a farmer sales tax identification card, or all relevant data
elements and the department makes a request for substantiation of the
exemption, the seller has one hundred twenty (120) days from the date of the
request to prove by other means that the transaction was not subject to sales
or use tax or to obtain in good faith a fully completed exemption certificate
or a copy of a farmer sales tax identification card from the purchaser.
(B) As used in this subsection, “good
(h)(1) In lieu of an exemption certificate under this section:
(A) The secretary shall provide an eligible farmer with a farmer
sales tax identification card to assist retailers in properly accounting for
nontaxable sales of tangible personal property or taxable services to a
person engaged in farming; and
(B) A person engaged in farming may present a farmer sales tax
identification card to a seller to obtain an exemption under § 26-52-401 et
seq.
(2)(A) If a purchaser uses a farmer sales tax identification card
issued under this subsection to claim an exemption from sales or use tax, the
department may request that the purchaser provide documentation supporting
entitlement to the claimed exemption.
(B) If the department determines an item purchased exempt
from sales and use tax using a farmer sales tax identification card was not
entitled to the exemption provided under this section, the department may
assess the sales or use tax, interest, and a penalty against the purchaser
who claimed the exemption.
(i) As used in this section:
(1) “Eligible farmer” means a person or entity that:
(A) Is engaged in farming;
(B) Has demonstrated to the secretary that the person or
03-31-2025 12:54:10 CEB147

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1594
entity has the resources and capacity to produce food, fiber, grass sod, or
nursery products in commercially marketable quantities; and
(C) Except as provided in subdivision (j)(2) of this
section, either:
(i) Provides a copy of a schedule 1040F, 1065, or
other equivalent tax form filed with the person's or entity's income tax
return for the most recent three-year period to report gain or loss from
farming activities; or
(ii) If the person or entity has been farming for
fewer than three (3) years, files a three-year business plan, on a form
provided by the secretary, demonstrating that the applicant has acquired
land, loans, financing, and other resources necessary to establish and
operate a farm capable of producing commercially marketable quantities of
food, fiber, grass sod, or nursery products;
(2) "Farming" means the agricultural production of food or fiber
as a business or the agricultural production of grass sod or nursery products
as a business; and
(3) "Good faith” means that the seller obtains a certificate
that claims an exemption certificate or farmer sales tax identification card
for an exemption that:
(i)(A) Was statutorily available on the date of the
transaction in the jurisdiction where the transaction is sourced;
(ii)(B) Could be applicable to the item being
purchased; and
(iii)(C) Is reasonable for the purchaser's type of
business.
(j)(1) A farmer sales tax identification card issued under subsection
(h) of this section:
(A) Shall expire eight (8) years from the date of
issuance; and
(B) Is subject to renewal by the secretary upon
application by the eligible farmer.
(2) An eligible farmer applying to renew an existing farmer
sales tax identification card under this subsection is not required to
provide the documents required under subdivision (i)(1)(C) of this section if
the eligible farmer certifies that neither the eligible farmer's farm nor
03-31-2025 12:54:10 CEB147

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 HB1594
other application information has changed since the expiring farmer sales tax
identification card was issued.
(k)(1) An applicant for a farmer sales tax identification card shall
pay an application fee of:
(A) Twenty dollars ($20.00) for a new farmer sales tax
identification card; and
(B) Ten dollars ($10.00) for the renewal of a farmer sales
tax identification card.
(2) The fees collected under this section shall be deposited
into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Central Services Fund as
direct revenue to be used by the Revenue Division of the Department of
Finance and Administration to defray the cost of administering the farmer
sales tax identification card and for other related purposes as required by
the secretary in carrying out the functions, powers, and duties of the
division.

SECTION 2. This act is effective on and after January 1, 2026.

/s/Vaught

















03-31-2025 12:54:10 CEB147